Utah statutes.
78B-8-502.   Legislative findings -- Purpose.

The Legislature finds that small businesses may be deterred from seeking review of or defending against substantially unjustified governmental action because of the expense involved in securing the vindication of their rights.  The purpose of this part is to entitle small businesses, under conditions set forth in this act, to recover reasonable litigation expenses.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

